Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202682-321
Construction project; artwork; committee; created; members; waiver of requirement; duties.

(1) A committee shall be established for each construction project which comes under sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03. The committee shall consist of the architect, three members from the board, agency, commission, or department for which the building is being constructed, and three members of the Nebraska Arts Council or three members chosen by the council. The committee shall consult with the Nebraska Arts Council in carrying out sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03.

(2) A board, agency, commission, or department of state government may request approval of a waiver from the committee for a construction project. The committee shall consider whether extraordinary circumstances exist such that the installation of works of art would not be appropriate. If the committee makes such a finding, the committee shall notify the requesting party of the approval of the waiver of the requirements of section 82-319.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB660, § 34.